Utah statutes.
20A-6-103 (Superseded 01/01/12).   Internet voting pilot project.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, any county may, if selected by the Department of Defense, participate in the Federal Voting Assistance Program pilot project to allow military and voters overseas as defined by Section 20A-3-403 to register to vote and cast their votes electronically.

